Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 2. Municipal Cemeteries

§ 35-8-201.
Power of cities and towns with respect to cemeteries.

In addition to the powers conferred upon them by law, each incorporated city or town in the state of Wyoming shall have power and authority to purchase, hold, and pay for lands, not exceeding eighty (80) acres in one (1) body, outside of the limits of any incorporated city or town, for the purpose of the burial of the dead; to have and exercise such police jurisdiction over the same, and over any cemetery lying near said city or town and used by the inhabitants thereof, as may be necessary for the proper control and regulation of the same; to survey, plat, map, grade, fence, ornament, and otherwise improve all burial and cemetery grounds and the avenues or streets leading thereto, owned by the city or town; to construct walks, rear and protect ornamental trees therein, and provide for paying the cost thereof; to convey cemetery lots owned by such city or town, and to issue deeds of conveyance therefor in such form and with such conditions therein as may be prescribed by the mayor and council of such city or town, which deeds of conveyance shall be signed by the mayor and attested by the city clerk of such city or town; to limit the number of cemetery lots which shall be owned by the same person at the same time; and to prescribe rules for enclosing and adorning cemetery lots, and the erection of monuments and tombstones thereon.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 90, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 2150; R.S. 1931, § 18-201; C.S. 1945, § 38-201; W.S. 1957, § 35-377.

Cross references. —

As to powers of cities and towns generally, see §

15-1-103

.

§ 35-8-202.
Purchase of grounds outside corporate limits.

For the purpose of carrying out any of the powers conferred by this act [§§

35-8-201

through

35-8-211

], any such city or town may go beyond its corporate limits and purchase, or otherwise acquire, real property.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 90, § 11; C.S. 1920, § 2160; R.S. 1931, § 18-211; C.S. 1945, § 38-211; W.S. 1957, § 35-378.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Zoning regulations in relation to cemeteries, 96 ALR3d 921.

§ 35-8-203.
Bond issue; purposes for which issue authorized; denominations, form, interest and issuance.

An incorporated city or town in the state of Wyoming is authorized, for the purpose of providing funds for purchasing and improving lands for cemetery purposes, to borrow money and to issue negotiable coupon bonds of the city or town in an amount not exceeding at one (1) time two percent (2%) of the assessed value of the city or town. The bonds shall be of the denominations as the city or town council shall determine, which bonds shall be numbered consecutively from one (1) upward, payable in thirty (30) years from date of issue, and redeemable at the pleasure of the city or town after ten (10) years, and shall bear interest at a rate determined by the city or town council. The bonds when issued shall be signed by the mayor and countersigned by the clerk and the treasurer of the city or town but the bonds shall not be sold for less than their par value.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 90, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 2151; R.S. 1931, § 18-202; C.S. 1945, § 38-202; W.S. 1957, § 35-379; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 30; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional limitation on municipal debt, see art. 16, § 5, Wyo. Const.

As to limitation of amount and redemption of bonds, see §§

16-5-301

to

16-5-303

.

§ 35-8-204.
Bond issue; submission of issue to voters.

No bonds shall be issued for the purpose provided by this article until the proposition to issue the same shall have been submitted to a vote of the qualified electors of the city or town, and by them approved. The proposition shall be submitted at an election called, conducted, canvassed and returned in the manner provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

. The proposition so submitted to a vote of the qualified electors shall specify the amount of the bonds proposed to be issued, the rate of interest, and the purpose for which it is proposed to issue the same. It shall be the duty of the city clerk of the city or town to cause ballots to be prepared, either separately from other ballots in case of a special election, or upon other ballots in case of a primary or general election, with the words “for cemetery bonds” and “against cemetery bonds”, leaving a place opposite each proposition in which the voter shall mark his vote for or against the bonds. If, upon a canvass of the votes upon such proposition, a majority of the votes be for the issue of the bonds, then the mayor and city council are authorized to issue same as provided in this act.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 90, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 2154; R.S. 1931, § 18-205; C.S. 1945, § 38-205; W.S. 1957, § 35-380; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision requiring voter approval, see art. 16, § 4, Wyo. Const.

§ 35-8-205.
Bond issue; cemetery bond tax.

There shall be annually levied and collected on all taxable property, real, personal, and mixed, within such city or town, a sufficient tax to pay the interest on said bonds as the same may become due, and to redeem such bonds as provided in this article, which tax shall be levied and collected in the same manner as other city or town taxes; said taxes to be known as the “cemetery bond tax”, and shall be used for the payment of interest, principal, and the redemption of the bonds so issued, and for no other purpose. And all moneys collected by such cities or towns from purchasers of cemetery lots, save such amount as shall be required for the maintenance and improvement of such cemeteries, shall become part of the cemetery bond fund, and shall be used only for the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds in this act [§§

35-8-201

through

35-8-211

] authorized to be issued.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 90, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 2153; R.S. 1931, § 18-204; C.S. 1945, § 38-204; W.S. 1957, § 35-381.

§ 35-8-206.
Bond issue; bond register.

The city or town treasurer shall keep a book in which shall be registered all such bonds, showing the number of the bond, the date of issue, to whom issued, the amount, the date of redemption, and payment of interest; which book shall be open to all persons to examine the same during business hours.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 90, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 2152; R.S. 1931, § 18-203; C.S. 1945, § 38-203; W.S. 1957, § 35-382.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision requiring endorsement on bonds, see art. 16, § 8, Wyo. Const.

§ 35-8-207.
Bond issue; redemption of bonds.

Any city or town, issuing bonds for the purpose provided in this act [§§

35-8-201

through

35-8-211

], shall each year after the tenth year after the issue of said bonds, redeem at least one-twentieth of the said bonds in the order of their issue.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 90, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 2155; R.S. 1931, § 18-206; C.S. 1945, § 38-206; W.S. 1957, § 35-283.

Cross references. —

As to redemption of bonds held by state, see §

16-5-303

.

§ 35-8-208.
Bond issue; duty of treasurer upon payment.

It shall be the duty of the city or town treasurer, as rapidly as any coupons of said bonds are paid, to cause the word “paid” to be cut in the same, and as rapidly as said bonds are paid to cause the word “paid” to be cut in the body of the same.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 90, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 2156; R.S. 1931, § 18-207; C.S. 1945, § 38-207; W.S. 1957, § 35-284.

§ 35-8-209.
Bond issue; custodian of moneys collected.

The city or town treasurer shall be custodian of all moneys arising from the sale of bonds issued in pursuance of the authority given by this chapter, and he shall give additional bond, or bonds, for the safekeeping and distributing of all such funds, as may be provided by the city or town council.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 90, § 8; C.S. 1920, § 2157; R.S. 1931, § 18-208; C.S. 1945, § 38-208; W.S. 1957, § 35-385.

§ 35-8-210.
Ordinances, rules and regulations.

Any such city or town is hereby authorized and empowered to enact all ordinances necessary to the complete exercise of all the powers in this act [§§

35-8-201

through

35-8-211

] granted, and to carry out the same, and is authorized to make all ordinances, rules, and regulations for the protection, maintenance, and improvement of such cemeteries, and of all property connected therewith, and all streets, avenues, and roads leading to such cemeteries.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 90, § 9; C.S. 1920, § 2158; R.S. 1931, § 18-209; C.S. 1945, § 38-209; W.S. 1957, § 35-386.

§ 35-8-211.
Application.

This act [§§

35-8-201

through

35-8-211

] shall apply to all cities and towns in the state of Wyoming whether incorporated by special charter or under general laws, and the taxes herein provided for, shall be in addition to all other taxes provided or authorized by law.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 90, § 10; C.S. 1920, § 2159; R.S. 1931, § 18-210; C.S. 1945, § 38-210; W.S. 1957, § 35-387.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 12, ch. 90, Laws 1917, repealed § 1695, ch. 121, C.S. 1910, and all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 35-8-212.
Authority to declare abandoned unoccupied lots; procedure; resale.

Any city, town or special cemetery district may declare abandoned the ownership of any unoccupied lots or parcels of land in municipally owned cemeteries, created under and by virtue of W.S.

35-8-201

through

35-8-211

, inclusive, or any special cemetery district whenever there has been no contact with or knowledge of the owners, heirs, or assigns, as the case may be, of such lots or parcels for more than twenty-five (25) years. Prior to declaring such abandonment, notice shall be served by registered mail at the last known address of such owner, heirs, or assigns. In the event that the address cannot be ascertained, notice shall be given by one (1) publication in the official newspaper of the municipality or special cemetery district in which the cemetery is located. Said notice shall allow thirty (30) days for the owner, heirs, or assigns to advise the city or town or special cemetery district of his identity and address; and if he does so, the city or town or special cemetery district shall not declare the abandonment. Upon the failure of the owner, heirs, or assigns to so communicate with the city or town, it may by resolution declare such lots or parcels abandoned. Thereafter, it may resell such lots or parcels, but shall place in trust an amount of money equivalent to the original selling price of such lots or parcels for payment to the owner, heirs, or assigns. Said trust fund shall be placed in legal investments, and the interest received therefrom shall annually be deposited to the city’s or town’s general fund or the general fund of the special cemetery district. Money received from the resale of such lots and parcels and deposited in said trust fund may be withdrawn by the cities or towns or the special cemetery district and placed in their general fund if not claimed by the owner, heirs, or assigns within twenty-five (25) years after being so deposited. So long as such lots or parcels remain unsold, the owners, heirs, or assigns may reclaim them by identifying themselves and establishing their right to such lots or parcels.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 221, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-387.1; Laws 1971, ch. 76, § 1.